Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,165
Merger between parent and subsidiary
or between subsidiaries.

(MBCA
11.05) (a) A domestic parent corporation that owns shares of a domestic or
foreign subsidiary corporation that carry at least ninety percent of the voting
power of each class and series of the outstanding shares of the subsidiary
that have voting power may merge the subsidiary into itself or into another
such subsidiary, or merge itself into the subsidiary, without the approval
of the board of directors or shareholders of the subsidiary unless the articles
of incorporation of any of the corporations otherwise provide, and unless,
in the case of a foreign subsidiary, approval by the subsidiary's board of
directors or shareholders is required by the laws under which the subsidiary
is organized.

(b) If under subsection (a)
of this section approval of a merger by the subsidiary's shareholders is not
required, the parent corporation shall within ten days after the effective
date of the merger notify each of the subsidiary's shareholders that the merger
has become effective.

(c)
Except as provided in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, a merger between
a parent and a subsidiary shall be governed by the provisions of sections
21-2,161 to 21-2,168 applicable to mergers generally.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 165.